Arkansas, session 2025, SB120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Personal care service providers are a vital component in the
recovery from an illness or injury and in the treatment of chronic conditions
for vulnerable aging adults;
(2) Consumers should have confidence when securing a personal
care service provider that all employees are adequately trained to care for
the needs of vulnerable aging adults; and
(3) All personal care service providers should be subject to the
same rules.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that all
private care agencies have the same licensure process in addition to the
certification by the Department of Human Services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 20-10-2302 — 20-10-2304 are amended to
*JMB135*
04-01-2025 10:05:40 JMB135

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 S4/1/25 SB120
read as follows:
20-10-2302. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, “private care agency” means a provider that
is certified by the Division of Provider Services and Quality Assurance as a
provider of home- and community-based health services licensed by the State
Board of Health as a provider of personal care services and that:
(1) Furnishes in-home staffing services for personal and
attendant care services; and
(2) Retains liability insurance of not less than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) to cover its employees and independent contractors while
its employees and independent contractors are engaged in providing personal
and attendant care services.

20-10-2303. Private care agencies eligible for Medicaid reimbursement.
The Division of Medical Services shall take such action as required by
the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services to amend the Arkansas Medicaid
Manual to include private care agencies that:
(1) Provide provide personal care services twenty-four (24)
hours a day and seven (7) days a week as a qualified healthcare provider that
is eligible for Medicaid reimbursement; and
(2) Are certified by the Division of Provider Services and
Quality Assurance as a provider of home- and community-based health services.

20-10-2304. Rules.
(a) The State Board of Health shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement this subchapter.
(b) To be eligible for reimbursement under this subchapter, the a
private care agency shall provide personal care services that comply with
rules promulgated by the board and be certified by the Division of Provider
Services and Quality Assurance as a provider of home- and community-based
health services.
(c) The board shall:
(1) Establish a separate licensure category for private care
agencies that provide personal care services twenty-four (24) hours a day and
seven (7) days a week;
(2)(A) Adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and standards as
04-01-2025 10:05:40 JMB135

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 S4/1/25 SB120
necessary to implement this subchapter.
(B) A rule adopted to implement this subchapter shall be
amended or repealed by the board as in the interest of the public through the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;
(3) Require that:
(A)(i) A qualified supervisor shall establish the
frequency of in-person supervisory visits as part of the patient's plan of
care based on the specific needs of the patient and the recommendations of
the registered nurse.
(ii) The frequency of in-person visits shall be at
least annually.
(iii)(a) A qualified supervisor shall be a
licensed nurse or have completed two (2) years of full-time study at an
accredited institution of higher education.
(b) An individual who has a high school
diploma or general equivalency diploma may substitute one (1) year of full-
time employment in a supervisory capacity in a healthcare facility or
community-based agency for one (1) year at an institution of higher
education; and
(B) A private care agency maintain a primary location in
Arkansas and a sufficient number of regional offices to adequately service
the administrative needs of the private care agency and the patients of the
private care agency; and
(4) Not require:
(A) A registered nurse to visit a patient every sixty-two
(62) days to supervise services; or
(B) A branch office of a private care agency to be within
a one-hundred-mile radius of a patient's home.
(3) Require that an employee, independent contractor, or agent
who is providing personal care services on behalf of the private care agency:
(A) Submit to:
(i) A federal criminal background check if the
applicant has not lived continuously in this state in the last five (5)
years;
(ii) A state criminal background check under § 20-
38-101 et seq., including any exemptions under § 20-38-101 et seq.; and
04-01-2025 10:05:40 JMB135

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 S4/1/25 SB120
(iii) A check of registries of this state or another
state, including without limitation a child maltreatment registry and an
adult maltreatment registry; and
(B) Complete forty (40) hours of training as determined by
the board; and
(4)(A) Establish an annual licensure fee of one thousand dollars
($1,000) for a private care agency.
(B) If a private care agency does not renew its license
and pay the annual licensure fee under subdivision (c)(4) of this section on
or before the expiration of the license, the private care agency shall:
(i) Pay a late renewal fee of an additional ten
dollars ($10.00) per day for up to seven (7) calendar days after the
expiration date of the license; and
(ii) If renewed after seven (7) calendar days after
the expiration date of the license, submit a new application for licensure.
(d) The Department of Health shall implement the board's rules and
supervise the conduct of the private care agencies as defined under this
subchapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 10, Subchapter 23, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-10-2305. Requirements for a private care agency.
(a) The State Board of Health shall require that a private care
agency:
(1)(A) Has a qualified supervisor that establishes the frequency
of in-person supervisory visits as part of a patient's plan of care based on
the specific needs of the patient and the recommendations of the registered
nurse.
(B) The frequency of in-person visits shall be at least
annually.
(C)(i) A qualified supervisor shall be a licensed nurse or
have completed two (2) years of full-time study at an accredited institution
of higher education.
(ii) An individual who has a high school diploma or
general equivalency diploma may substitute one (1) year of full-time
employment in a supervisory capacity in a healthcare facility or community-
04-01-2025 10:05:40 JMB135

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 S4/1/25 SB120
based agency for one (1) year at an institution of higher education.
(D) Subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(C) of this section shall only
apply to a private care agency when providing care to Medicaid beneficiaries;
and
(2) Maintains a primary location in Arkansas and a sufficient
number of regional offices to adequately service the administrative needs of
the private care agency and the patients of the private care agency.
(b) The board shall not require a private care agency to have:
(1) A registered nurse to visit a patient every sixty-two (62)
days to supervise services; or
(2) A branch office of a private care agency to be within a one-
hundred-mile radius of a patient's home.

SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE.
This act shall be effective on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/C. Penzo



















04-01-2025 10:05:40 JMB135